src-fst-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
* Noun 14 ritśkas examples:*
* *ritśkas* `ritśkas+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *ritśka* `ritśkas+N+Sg+Gen:`
* *ritśkast* `ritśkas+N+Sg+Par:`
* *ritśkahe* `ritśkas+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *ritśkast* `ritśkas+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *ritśkalõ* `ritśkas+N+Sg+All:`
* *ritśkal* `ritśkas+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *ritśkalt* `ritśkas+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *ritśkas* `ritśkas+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *ritśkaniq* `ritśkas+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *ritśkaldaq* `ritśkas+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *ritśkagaq* `ritśkas+N+Sg+Com:`
* *ritśkaq* `ritśkas+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *ritśkit* `ritśkas+N+Pl+Par:`
* *ritśkihe* `ritśkas+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *ritśkist* `ritśkas+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *ritśkilõ* `ritśkas+N+Pl+All:`
* *ritśkil* `ritśkas+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *ritśkilt* `ritśkas+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *ritśkis* `ritśkas+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *ritśkiniq* `ritśkas+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *ritśkildaq* `ritśkas+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *ritśkidõgaq* `ritśkas+N+Pl+Com:`

* **LEXICON NMN_14HAMMAS/IKAES ** hammas:ham%{bm%}a%{sØ%}

* Noun 14 hammas examples:*
* *hammas* `hammas+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *hammast* `hammas+N+Sg+Par:`
* *hambahe* `hammas+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *hambast* `hammas+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *hambalõ* `hammas+N+Sg+All:`
* *hambal* `hammas+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *hambalt* `hammas+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *hambas* `hammas+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *hambaniq* `hammas+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *hambaldaq* `hammas+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *hambagaq* `hammas+N+Sg+Com:`
* *hambaq* `hammas+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *hambit* `hammas+N+Pl+Par:`
* *hambihe* `hammas+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *hambist* `hammas+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *hambilõ* `hammas+N+Pl+All:`
* *hambil* `hammas+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *hambilt* `hammas+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *hambis* `hammas+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *hambiniq* `hammas+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *hambildaq* `hammas+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *hambidõgaq* `hammas+N+Pl+Com:`

Distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due to gradation
Yaml: __N-hammas_gt-norm.yaml__

* Noun 14 nummõŕ examples:*
* *nummõŕ* `nummõŕ+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *nummõrd* `nummõŕ+N+Sg+Par:`
* *numbrõhe* `nummõŕ+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *numbrõst* `nummõŕ+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *numbrõlõ* `nummõŕ+N+Sg+All:`
* *numbrõl* `nummõŕ+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *numbrõlt* `nummõŕ+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *numbrõs* `nummõŕ+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *numbrõniq* `nummõŕ+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *numbrõldaq* `nummõŕ+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *numbrõgaq* `nummõŕ+N+Sg+Com:`
* *numbrõq* `nummõŕ+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *numbrit* `nummõŕ+N+Pl+Par:`
* *numbrihe* `nummõŕ+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *numbrist* `nummõŕ+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *numbrilõ* `nummõŕ+N+Pl+All:`
* *numbril* `nummõŕ+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *numbrilt* `nummõŕ+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *numbris* `nummõŕ+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *numbriniq* `nummõŕ+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *numbrildaq* `nummõŕ+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *numbridõgaq* `nummõŕ+N+Pl+Com:`
Distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due to gradation
Yaml: __N-nummõŕ_gt-norm.yaml__

Distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due  to word final h
vowel_harmony_variant: hamõh
Yaml: __N-pereh_gt-norm.yaml__

* Noun 14 hamõh examples:*
* *hamõh* `hamõh+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *hamõht* `hamõh+N+Sg+Par:`
* *hammõhe* `hamõh+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *hammõst* `hamõh+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *hammõlõ* `hamõh+N+Sg+All:`
* *hammõl* `hamõh+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *hammõlt* `hamõh+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *hammõs* `hamõh+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *hammõniq* `hamõh+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *hammõldaq* `hamõh+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *hammõgaq* `hamõh+N+Sg+Com:`
* *hammõq* `hamõh+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *hammit* `hamõh+N+Pl+Par:`
* *hammihe* `hamõh+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *hammist* `hamõh+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *hammilõ* `hamõh+N+Pl+All:`
* *hammil* `hamõh+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *hammilt* `hamõh+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *hammis* `hamõh+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *hamminiq* `hamõh+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *hammildaq* `hamõh+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *hammidõgaq* `hamõh+N+Pl+Com:`
Distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due  to word final h
vowel_harmony_variant: pereh
Yaml: __N-hamwh_gt-norm.yaml__

* Noun 15 kotus examples:*
* *kotus* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *kotust* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Par:`
* *kotussõhe* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *kotussõst* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *kotussõlõ* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+All:`
* *kotussõl* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *kotussõlt* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *kotussõs* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *kotussõniq* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *kotussõldaq* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *kotusõgaq* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Com:`
* *kotusõq* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *kotussit* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Par:`
* *kotussihe* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *kotussist* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *kotussilõ* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+All:`
* *kotussil* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *kotussilt* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *kotussis* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *kotussiniq* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *kotussildaq* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *kotussidõgaq* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Com:`

* Noun 15 kotus examples:*
* *kotus* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *kotust* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Par:`
* *kotussõhe* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *kotussõst* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *kotussõlõ* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+All:`
* *kotussõl* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *kotussõlt* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *kotussõs* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *kotussõniq* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *kotussõldaq* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *kotusõgaq* `kotus+Hom1+N+Sg+Com:`
* *kotusõq* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *kotussit* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Par:`
* *kotussihe* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *kotussist* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *kotussilõ* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+All:`
* *kotussil* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *kotussilt* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *kotussis* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *kotussiniq* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *kotussildaq* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *kotussidõgaq* `kotus+Hom1+N+Pl+Com:`

LEXICON NMN_16ABILINW/INEMINE  inemine:inemi abilinõ:abili
* Yaml: **N-inemine16**

LEXICON NMN_16TSIRGUKWNW/TERAEKENE  inemine:inemi tsirgukõnõ:abili
* Yaml: **N-inemine16**

* LEXICON NMN_17ALGUS/UETSUES  aivastus:aivastus
* Yaml: **N-aivastus18**

LEXICON NMN_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE   alomanõ:aloma
* Yaml: **A-alomanw19**

* Yaml: **N-latsj20**

* Yaml: **N-vaeitsj20**

* Yaml: **N-vaeitsj20**

* Yaml: **N-vaeitsj20**

* Yaml: **N-vaeitsj20**

LEXICON NMN_22NAANW  naanõ:naa
* Yaml: **N-vwrokwnw22**

LEXICON NMN_22VWROKWNW/VAEHAEKENE  vähäkene:vähäke
* Yaml: **N-vaehaekene22**

* **LEXICON NMN_23NUUL1/KIIL1 ** nuuĺ:nool
* Yaml: **N-nuulj**

* **LEXICON NMN_23SUUR1 ** suuŕ:suur
* Yaml: **N-suurj**

* Yaml: **N-kiilj23**

* Yaml: **N-hiirj23**

* Yaml: **N-susi24**

* Yaml: **N-susi24**

* Yaml: **N-sueaeq25**

* Yaml: **N-hepemj26**

* **LEXICON NMN_27HAPU ** hapu:hapu
Yaml: **N-hapu27**

* **LEXICON NMN_27XX/LAEMMI ** lämmi:lämmi
Yaml: **N-hapu27**

* **LEXICON NMN_27KUEMMEND ** kümmend:küm

* **LEXICON NMN_28TUETAER1 ** tütäŕ:tütär
* Yaml: **N-tuetaerj28, N-kannwl28**

* **LEXICON NMN_28AHER/XX ** aher:ah%{tØ%}er
* Yaml: **N-tuetaerj28**

* Yaml: **N-pindaer28**

* Yaml: **N-tuetaerj28, N-kannwl28**

* Yaml: **N-kannwl28**
gradation= yes

* Yaml: **N-kannwl28**
gradation= no

* Yaml: **N-pundar28**

* Yaml: **N-pää29**

* LEXICON NMN_30MAA/TUEUE  tüü:tüü
* Yaml: **N-tueue30**

* Noun 33 igä examples:*
* *igä:* `igä+N+Sg+Nom`
* *iä:* `igä+N+Sg+Gen`
* *ikä:* `igä+N+Sg+Par`
* *ikkä:* `igä+N+Sg+Ill`
* *iän:* `igä+N+Sg+Ine`
* *iäst:* `igä+N+Sg+Ela`
* *iäle:* `igä+N+Sg+All`
* *iäl:* `igä+N+Sg+Ade`
* *iält:* `igä+N+Sg+Abl`
* *iäs:* `igä+N+Sg+Tra`
* *iäniq:* `igä+N+Sg+Ter`
* *iäldäq:* `igä+N+Sg+Abe`
* *iägaq:* `igä+N+Sg+Com`
* *iäq:* `igä+N+Pl+Nom`
* *iki:* `igä+N+Pl+Gen`
* *iki:* `igä+N+Pl+Par`
* *ikkihe:* `igä+N+Pl+Ill`
* *ikin:* `igä+N+Pl+Ine`
* *ikist:* `igä+N+Pl+Ela`
* *ikile:* `igä+N+Pl+All`
* *ikil:* `igä+N+Pl+Ade`
* *ikilt:* `igä+N+Pl+Abl`
* *ikis:* `igä+N+Pl+Tra`
* *ikiniq:* `igä+N+Pl+Ter`
* *ikildäq:* `igä+N+Pl+Abe`
* *ikigaq:* `igä+N+Pl+Com`

* LEXICON NMN_35EGAE  egä:e%{kØ%}%{kg%}ä

* LEXICON NMN_35UMA/PESAE  pesä:pe%{sØ%}sä

nimi:nim
* Yaml: **N-nimi**

* nimi examples:*
* *nimi:* `nimi+N+Sg+Nom`
* *nime:* `nimi+N+Sg+Gen`
* *nimme:* `nimi+N+Sg+Par`
* *nimme:* `nimi+N+Sg+Ill`
* *nimen:* `nimi+N+Sg+Ine`
* *nimest:* `nimi+N+Sg+Ela`
* *nimele:* `nimi+N+Sg+All`
* *nimel:* `nimi+N+Sg+Ade`
* *nimelt:* `nimi+N+Sg+Abl`
* *nimes:* `nimi+N+Sg+Tra`
* *nimeniq:* `nimi+N+Sg+Ter`
* *nimeldäq:* `nimi+N+Sg+Abe`
* *nimegaq:* `nimi+N+Sg+Com`
* *nimeq:* `nimi+N+Pl+Nom`
* *nimmi:* `nimi+N+Pl+Gen`
* *nimmi:* `nimi+N+Pl+Par`
* *nimmihe:* `nimi+N+Pl+Ill`
* *nimin:* `nimi+N+Pl+Ine`
* *nimist:* `nimi+N+Pl+Ela`
* *nimile:* `nimi+N+Pl+All`
* *nimil:* `nimi+N+Pl+Ade`
* *nimilt:* `nimi+N+Pl+Abl`
* *nimis:* `nimi+N+Pl+Tra`
* *niminiq:* `nimi+N+Pl+Ter`
* *nimildäq:* `nimi+N+Pl+Abe`
* *nimmigaq:* `nimi+N+Pl+Com`

* +Err/Orth-no-pal:%^StrGStem%^NoPAL        Harm_Neutr_SG-NOM  ;  no palatal

* särǵ examples:*
* *särǵ:* `särǵ+N+Sg+Nom`
* *säre:* `särǵ+N+Sg+Gen`
* *särge:* `särǵ+N+Sg+Par`
* *särge:* `särǵ+N+Sg+Ill`
* *sären:* `särǵ+N+Sg+Ine`
* *särest:* `särǵ+N+Sg+Ela`
* *särele:* `särǵ+N+Sg+All`
* *särel:* `särǵ+N+Sg+Ade`
* *särelt:* `särǵ+N+Sg+Abl`
* *säres:* `särǵ+N+Sg+Tra`
* *säreniq:* `särǵ+N+Sg+Ter`
* *säreldäq:* `särǵ+N+Sg+Abe`
* *säregaq:* `särǵ+N+Sg+Com`
* *säreq:* `särǵ+N+Pl+Nom`
* *särgi:* `särǵ+N+Pl+Gen`
* *särgi:* `särǵ+N+Pl+Par`
* *särgihe:* `särǵ+N+Pl+Ill`
* *särin:* `särǵ+N+Pl+Ine`
* *särist:* `särǵ+N+Pl+Ela`
* *särile:* `särǵ+N+Pl+All`
* *säril:* `särǵ+N+Pl+Ade`
* *särilt:* `särǵ+N+Pl+Abl`
* *säris:* `särǵ+N+Pl+Tra`
* *säriniq:* `särǵ+N+Pl+Ter`
* *särildäq:* `särǵ+N+Pl+Abe`
* *särgigaq:* `särǵ+N+Pl+Com`

* LEXICON NMN_36KWIK1/XX1   kõiḱ:kõi%{kØ%}%{kḱg%}

**LEXICON NMN_46SWBWR **
sõbõr:sõbõr
Oblique plural in o
* Yaml: **N-swbwr36**
derived from 36SAERG1

kubõl:ku%{pb%}õl
Oblique plural in õ
* Yaml: **N-swbwr36**
derived from 36SAERG1

pini:pi%{nØ%}ni

* Noun 37 pini examples:*
* *pini* `pini+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *pini* `pini+N+Sg+Gen:`
* *pinni* `pini+N+Sg+Par:`
* *pinni* `pini+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *pinist* `pini+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *pinile* `pini+N+Sg+All:`
* *pinil* `pini+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *pinilt* `pini+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *pinis* `pini+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *pininiq* `pini+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *pinildäq* `pini+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *pinigaq* `pini+N+Sg+Com:`
* *piniq* `pini+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *pinne* `pini+N+Pl+Par:`
* *pinnehe* `pini+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *pinest* `pini+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *pinele* `pini+N+Pl+All:`
* *pinel* `pini+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *pinelt* `pini+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *pines* `pini+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *pineniq* `pini+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *pineldäq* `pini+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *pinnegaq* `pini+N+Pl+Com:`

pini:pi%{nØ%}ni

pung:pung

* Noun 38 pung examples:*

* LEXICON NMN_38PULL1/VIKS1  pulĺ:pull
* +Err/Orth-no-pal:%^StrGStem%^NoPAL%>        Harm_Neutr_SG-NOM  ;  no final palatal

* +Err/Orth-no-pal:%^StrGStem%^NoPAL%>        Harm_Neutr_SG-NOM  ;  no final palatal

* papṕ examples:*
* *papṕ:* `papṕ+N+Sg+Nom`
* *papi:* `papṕ+N+Sg+Gen`
* *pappi:* `papṕ+N+Sg+Par`
* *pappi:* `papṕ+N+Sg+Ill`
* *papin:* `papṕ+N+Sg+Ine`
* *papist:* `papṕ+N+Sg+Ela`
* *papilõ:* `papṕ+N+Sg+All`
* *papil:* `papṕ+N+Sg+Ade`
* *papilt:* `papṕ+N+Sg+Abl`
* *papis:* `papṕ+N+Sg+Tra`
* *papiniq:* `papṕ+N+Sg+Ter`
* *papildaq:* `papṕ+N+Sg+Abe`
* *papigaq:* `papṕ+N+Sg+Com`
* *papiq:* `papṕ+N+Pl+Nom`
* *pappõ:* `papṕ+N+Pl+Gen`
* *pappõ:* `papṕ+N+Pl+Par`
* *pappõhe:* `papṕ+N+Pl+Ill`
* *papõn:* `papṕ+N+Pl+Ine`
* *papõst:* `papṕ+N+Pl+Ela`
* *papõlõ:* `papṕ+N+Pl+All`
* *papõl:* `papṕ+N+Pl+Ade`
* *papõlt:* `papṕ+N+Pl+Abl`
* *papõs:* `papṕ+N+Pl+Tra`
* *papõniq:* `papṕ+N+Pl+Ter`
* *papõldaq:* `papṕ+N+Pl+Abe`
* *pappegaq:* `papṕ+N+Pl+Com`

   * :%^VOWRaise%^StrGStem%^PAL        Harm_Neutr_SG-NOM  ;  pu̬u̬ḿ
* +Err/Orth-no-pal:%^VOWRaise%^StrGStem%^NoPAL        Harm_Neutr_SG-NOM  ;  no final palatal
   * :%^VOWLower%^WGStem%^NoPAL%>i       SG-GEN_ZERO-STEM        ;  poomi

kuld:kul%{dl%}

* Noun 38 kuld examples:*
* *kuld* `kuld+N+Sg+Nom:`
* *kulla* `kuld+N+Sg+Gen:`
* *kulda* `kuld+N+Sg+Par:`
* *kulda* `kuld+N+Sg+Ill:`
* *kullast* `kuld+N+Sg+Ela:`
* *kullalõ* `kuld+N+Sg+All:`
* *kullal* `kuld+N+Sg+Ade:`
* *kullalt* `kuld+N+Sg+Abl:`
* *kullas* `kuld+N+Sg+Tra:`
* *kullaniq* `kuld+N+Sg+Ter:`
* *kullaldaq* `kuld+N+Sg+Abe:`
* *kullagaq* `kuld+N+Sg+Com:`
* *kullaq* `kuld+N+Pl+Nom:`
* *kuldõ* `kuld+N+Pl+Par:`
* *kuldõhe* `kuld+N+Pl+Ill:`
* *kullõst* `kuld+N+Pl+Ela:`
* *kullõlõ* `kuld+N+Pl+All:`
* *kullõl* `kuld+N+Pl+Ade:`
* *kullõlt* `kuld+N+Pl+Abl:`
* *kullõs* `kuld+N+Pl+Tra:`
* *kullõniq* `kuld+N+Pl+Ter:`
* *kullõldaq* `kuld+N+Pl+Abe:`
* *kuldõgaq* `kuld+N+Pl+Com:`

kuld:kul%{dl%}
